North Dakota, session 69, HB1313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 12.1-32-02 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Every person convicted of an offense who is sentenced by the court must be sentenced to one
or a combination of the following alternatives, unless the sentencing alternatives are otherwise
specifically provided in the statute defining the offense or sentencing is deferred under
subsection 4:
a. Payment of the reasonable costs of the person's prosecution.
b. Probation.
c. A term of imprisonment, including intermittent imprisonment:
(1) In a state correctional facility in accordance with section 29-27-07, in a regional
corrections center, or in a county jail, if convicted of a felony or a class A
misdemeanor.
(2) In a county jail or in a regional corrections center, if convicted of a class B
misdemeanor.
(3) In a facility or program deemed appropriate for the treatment of the individual
offender, including available community-based or faith-based programs.
(4) In the case of persons convicted of an offense who are under eighteen years of age
at the time of sentencing, the court is limited to sentencing the minor defendant to a
term of imprisonment in the custody of the department of corrections and
rehabilitation.
d. A fine.
e. Restitution for damages resulting from the commission of the offense.
f. A no contact order prohibiting contact with a victim of the offense.
g. Restoration of damaged property or other appropriate work detail.
g.h. Commitment to an appropriate licensed public or private institution for treatment of
alcoholism, drug addiction, or mental disease or defect.
h.i. Commitment to a sexual offender treatment program.
i.j. Drug court program. A drug court is a district court supervised treatment program
approved by the supreme court which combines judicial supervision with alcohol and

H. B. NO. 1313 - PAGE 2
drug testing and substance use disorder treatment in a licensed treatment program. The
supreme court may adopt rules, including rules of procedure, for drug court programs.
j.k. Veterans treatment docket. A veterans treatment docket is a district court supervised
docket approved by the supreme court which combines judicial supervision with licensed
treatment programs to treat substance use disorders, mental health conditions,
behavioral health conditions, traumatic brain injuries, military sexual trauma, and
co-occurring disorders. The supreme court may adopt rules, including rules of procedure,
for veterans treatment dockets.
k.l. Completion of a restorative justice program. For purposes of this section, "restorative
justice program" means a system of justice which focuses on the rehabilitation of
offenders through reconciliation with victims and the community at large.
l.m. Mental health court program. A mental health court is a district court supervised
treatment program approved by the supreme court which combines judicial supervision
with mental health services and treatment in a licensed treatment program. The supreme
court may adopt rules, including rules of procedure, for mental health court programs.
Except as provided by section 12.1-32-06.1, sentences imposed under this subsection may
not exceed in duration the maximum sentences of imprisonment provided by section
12.1-32-01, section 12.1-32-09, or as provided specifically in a statute defining an offense.
This subsection does not permit the unconditional discharge of an offender following
conviction. A sentence under subdivision e or fg must be imposed in the manner provided in
section 12.1-32-08. If the person is sentenced to a term of imprisonment, the court may
prohibit the person from contacting the victim during the term of imprisonment. For purposes
of this subsection, "victim" means victim as defined in section 12.1-34-01.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subdivision h of subsection 5 of section 39-08-01 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
h. If the penalty mandated by this section includes imprisonment or placement upon
conviction of a violation of this section or equivalent ordinance, and if an addiction
evaluation has indicated that the defendant needs treatment, the court may order the
defendant to undergo treatment at an appropriate licensed addiction treatment program
under subdivision gh of subsection 1 of section 12.1-32-02 and the time spent by the
defendant in the treatment must be credited as a portion of a sentence of imprisonment
or placement under this section. A court may not order the department of corrections and
rehabilitation to be responsible for the costs of treatment in a private treatment facility.
SECTION 3. APPLICATION. This Act applies to a court order or any criminal sentencing imposed
after the effective date of this Act.

H. B. NO. 1313 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1313.
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State